New Jersey, session 221, A3811.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  The State Board of Education shall authorize a Teacher of the Blind or Visually Impaired Kindergarten through Grade 12 endorsement to the instructional certificate. The endorsement shall authorize the holder to teach blind or visually impaired students in all public schools in grades kindergarten through 12.  The holder of a Teacher of the Blind or Visually Impaired Preschool through Grade 12 endorsement shall not be required to obtain another subject or grade level endorsement in order to teach blind or visually impaired students in grades kindergarten through 12. b.    A candidate for the endorsement shall: (1) complete a State-approved Teacher of the Blind or Visually impaired program; and (2)   meet any other requirements established by the State board. 2.    The State Board of Education shall adopt, pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.), rules and regulations necessary to carry out the provisions of this act. 3.    This act shall take effect immediately.